Utah statutes.
47-3-303.   Rulemaking.

(1)  The State Armory Board, any state agency, or institution of higher education that operates or has control of a shooting range shall make rules in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, to implement procedures for use of the range by the public.

(2)  The rules shall include provisions requiring indoor shooting ranges to be available on a reservation basis, for firearms not exceeding the range design criteria:

(a)  at least twice per week;

(b)  after 4 p.m. on work or school days, or after students and faculty are excused or dismissed on the work or school day; and

(c)  between 8 a.m. and 10 p.m. on weekends.



Enacted by Chapter 155, 2013 General Session

